Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 7. Recovery of Possession.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Ejectment, § 1 et seq.

28A C.J.S., Ejectment, § 1 et seq.

Remedy of tenant against stranger wrongfully interfering with his possession, 12 ALR2d 1192.

Action to recover property of church or religious society, 20 ALR2d 498.

Measure and items of recovery for improvements mistakenly placed or made on land of another, 24 ALR2d 11.

Defense of adverse possession or statute of limitations as available under general denial or plea of general issue, 39 ALR2d 1426.

Right of landowner who has conveyed property to third person to maintain summary possessory action, 47 ALR2d 1170.

Compensation, upon eviction, for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 A.L.R.2d 263.

Dispossession of one spouse under execution on judgment against other, 58 ALR2d 773.

Common source of title doctrine, 5 ALR3d 375.

Measure and amount of damages recoverable under supersedeas bond in action involving recovery or possession of real estate, 9 ALR3d 330.

Failure of landlord to make, or permit tenant to make, repairs or alterations required by public authority as constructive eviction, 86 ALR3d 352.

Implied covenant or obligation to provide lessee with actual possession, 96 ALR3d 1155.

Modern status of rule as to tenant’s rent liability after injury to or destruction of demised premises, 99 ALR3d 738.

Sec. 09.45.630.
Actions for recovery of real property.

A person who has a legal estate in real property and has a present right to the possession of the property may bring an action to recover the possession of the property with damages for withholding it; however, recovery of possession from a tenant shall be made under AS

09.45.060

—

09.45.160

.

History.

(§ 25.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 10, SLA 1974 (SCSCSHB 226), see 1974 Senate Journal, p. 20.

Sec. 09.45.640.
Damages for withholding property and value of improvements as setoff.

When property is recovered from a defendant who, in good faith, holds the property under color of title adversely to the claim of the plaintiff, the value of any permanent improvements that the defendant or those under whom the defendant claims have made to the property shall be allowed as a setoff against damages allowed for the withholding of the property.
The plaintiff may recover damages for withholding the property for a term of six years before the commencement of the action and for the period from the commencement to the verdict, both excluding the use of permanent improvements made by the defendant.

History.

(§ 25.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For adverse possession under color of title, see AS

09.45.052

.

Sec. 09.45.650.
Termination of right to recover property during pendency of action.

Where the plaintiff shows a right to recover at the time the action was commenced, but it appears that the plaintiff’s right has terminated during the pendency of the action, the plaintiff may only recover damages for the withholding of the property.

History.

(§ 25.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.660.
Order for survey and measurement of property.

The court in which the action is pending may allow a party and the party’s surveyors to go on the property to make a survey for the purposes of the action.

History.

(§ 25.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For general provisions for entry on land by surveyors, see AS

34.65.020

.

Sec. 09.45.670.
Effect of alienation by person in possession.

An action for the recovery of the possession of real property against a person in possession cannot be prejudiced by an alienation made by that person either before or after the commencement of the action.
If the alienation is made after the commencement of the action and the defendant does not satisfy the judgment recovered for damages for withholding the possession, the damages may be recovered by action against the purchaser.

History.

(§ 25.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.680.
Mortgage not a conveyance.

A mortgage of real property is not a conveyance that will enable the owner of the mortgage to recover possession of the real property without a foreclosure and sale.

History.

(§ 25.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.690.
Failure to pay rent.

Unless otherwise provided in the lease, a landlord has a right to re-enter leased premises when a tenant fails to pay rent, and may bring action to recover the possession of the premises and the action is equivalent to a demand of the rent.
If, at any time before judgment, the lessee or a successor in interest pays the amount of rent in arrears with interest and costs of the action and performs the other covenants or agreements, the lessee or successor is entitled to continue in possession unless otherwise provided in the lease.

History.

(§ 25.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For actions to recover possession of premises, see AS

09.45.060

—

09.45.160

.

Sec. 09.45.700.
Judgment in actions to recover possession.

The judgment in an action to recover the possession of real property is conclusive as to the estate in the property and the right to the possession so far as it is determined upon the party against whom it is given and against all persons claiming from, through, or under that party after the commencement of the action.
However, when service of the summons is by publication and judgment is given for failure of a party to answer, that party or a successor in interest is at any time within two years from the entry of the judgment, upon application to the court, entitled to an order vacating the judgment and granting that party or a successor a new trial upon the payment of the costs of the action.

History.

(§ 25.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.710.
Possession when new trial granted.

If the judgment is set aside and a new trial granted as provided in AS

09.45.700

, after the plaintiff has taken possession of the property, the plaintiff shall remain in possession.
But if judgment is given for the defendant in the new trial, the defendant is entitled to restitution by execution as if the defendant were plaintiff.

History.

(§ 25.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.720.
Actions to recover possession by tenant in dower. [Repealed, § 1 ch 89 SLA 1984.]